Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Chapter 2
UNIFORM COMMERCIAL CODE — SALES

Part 1. Short Title, General Construction and Subject Matter

Sec.

Part 2. Form, Formation and Readjustment of Contract

Part 3. General Obligation and Construction of Contract

Part 4. Title, Creditors and Good Faith Purchasers

Part 5. Performance

Part 6. Breach, Repudiation and Excuse

Part 7. Remedies